Utah statutes.
17B-1-1307.   Notice of public hearing and of dissolution.
(1)  Before holding a public hearing required under Section 17B-1-1306, the
administrative body shall:
(a) (i)  publish notice of the public hearing and of the proposed dissolution:
(A)  in a newspaper of general circulation within the local district proposed
to be dissolved; and
(B)  in accordance with Section 45-1-101 for 30 days before the public
hearing; and
(ii)  post notice of the public hearing and of the proposed dissolution in at
least four conspicuous places within the local district proposed to be
dissolved, no less than five and no more than 30 days before the public
hearing; or
(b)  mail a notice to each owner of property located within the local district
and to each registered voter residing within the local district.
(2)  Each notice required under Subsection (1) shall:
(a)  identify the local district proposed to be dissolved and the service it
was created to provide; and
(b)  state the date, time, and location of the public hearing.
